en: E1450, Starch sodium octenyl succinate
xx: E1450
bg: E1450, Натриев октенил сукцинат на нишестето
ca: E1450, Octenilsuccinat sòdic de midó
cs: E1450, Sodná sůl oktenyljantaranu škrobu
da: E1450, Stivelsenatriumoctenylsuccinat
de: E1450, Stärkenatriumoctenylsuccinat
el: E1450, Οκτενυληλεκτρικο αμυλονατριο
es: E1450, Octenilsuccinato sódico de almidón, Octenil succinato sódico de almidón, Almidón succinato octenilo de sodio
et: E1450, Naatriumoktenüülsuktsinaattärklis
fi: E1450, Tärkkelysnatriumoktenyylisukkinaatti, Tärkkelysnatriumoktenyylisukkinaattia
fr: E1450, Octényle succinate d’amidon sodique, Octényle succinate d'amidon sodique
hu: E1450, Keményítő-nátrium-oktenil-szukcinát
it: E1450, Ottenilsuccinato di amido e sodio
lt: E1450, Krakmolo natrio oktenilsukcinatas
lv: E1450, Cietes nātrija oktenilsukcināts
mt: E1450, Ottenilsuċċinat tal-lamtu u tas-sodju
nl: E1450, Zetmeelnatriumoctenylsuccinaat
pl: E1450, Sól sodowa oktenylobursztynianu skrobiowego
pt: E1450, Octenilsuccinato de amido sódico
ro: E1450, Octenilsuccinat de amidon și sodiu
sk: E1450, Škrobový oktenyljantaran sodný
sl: E1450, Natrijev oktenilsukcinat škroba
sv: E1450, Natriumoktenylsuccinatstärkelse

en: E1451, Acetylated oxidised starch
xx: E1451
bg: E1451, Ацетилирано окислено нишесте
ca: E1451, Midó acetilat oxidat
cs: E1451, Acetylovaný oxidovaný škrob
da: E1451, Acetyleret oxideret stivelse
de: E1451, Acetylierte oxidierte stärke, E 1451
el: E1451, Ακετυλιωμενο οξειδωμενο αμυλο
es: E1451, Almidón oxidado acetilado
et: E1451, Atsetüülitud oksüdeeritud tärklis
fi: E1451, Asetyloitu hapetettu tärkkelys, Asetyloitua hapetettua tärkkelystä
fr: E1451, Amidon oxydé acétylé
hu: E1451, Acetilezett oxidált keményítő
it: E1451, Amido acetilato ossidato
lt: E1451, Acetilintas oksiduotas krakmolas
lv: E1451, Acetilēta oksidētā ciete
mt: E1451, Lamtu ossidat aċetilat
nl: E1451, Geacetyleerd geoxideerd zetmeel
pl: E1451, Acetylowana skrobia utleniona
pt: E1451, Amido oxidado acetilado
ro: E1451, Amidon oxidat acetilat
sk: E1451, Acetylovaný oxidovaný škrob
sl: E1451, Acetiliran oksidiran škrob
sv: E1451, Acetylerad oxiderad stärkelse

en: E1452, Starch aluminium octenyl succinate
xx: E1452
bg: E1452, Скорбелен алуминиев октенил сукцинат
ca: E1452, Octenilsuccinat alumínic de midó
cs: E1452, Škrobový oktenylsukcinát hlinitý
da: E1452, Stivelsealuminiumoctenylsuccinat
de: E1452, Stärkealuminiumoctenylsuccinat
el: E1452, Αργιλιουχο οκτενυληλεκτρικο αμυλο
es: E1452, Octenilsuccinato alumínico de almidón
et: E1452, Alumiiniumoktenüülsuktsinaattärklis
fi: E1452, Tärkkelysalumiinioktenyylisukkinaatti, Tärkkelysalumiinioktenyylisukkinaattia
fr: E1452, Succinate octenylique aluminique d'amidon, Octénylesuccinate d'amidon et d'aluminium
hu: E1452, Keményítő-alumínium-oktenil-szukcinát
it: E1452, Ottenilsuccinato di alluminio e amido
lt: E1452, Krakmolo aliuminio oktenilsukcinatas
lv: E1452, Cietes alumīnija oktenilsukcināts
mt: E1452, Ottenilsuċċinat tal-lamtu u l-aluminju
nl: E1452, Zetmeelaluminiumoctenylsuccinaat
pl: E1452, Sól glinowa oktenylobursztynianu skrobiowego
pt: E1452, Octenilsuccinato de amido alumínico
ro: E1452, Octenilsuccinat de amidon și aluminiu
sk: E1452, Škrobový oktenyljantaran hlinitý
sl: E1452, Aluminijev oktenil sukcinat škroba
sv: E1452, Stärkelse-aluminium-oktenyl-succinat

en: E14XX, Modified Starch
xx: E14XX
ar: نشا معدل
bg: E14XX, Модифицирано нишесте
ca: E14XX, Midó modificat, mido modificat
cs: E14XX, Modifikovaný škrob
de: E14XX, Modifizierte Stärke
el: E14XX, τροποποιημένο άμυλο
es: E14XX, Almidón modificado
et: E14XX, Modifitseeritu tärklis, Modifitseeritud tärklis
fi: E14XX, Muunnettu tärkkelys, Muunnettua tärkkelystä, Muunneltu tärkkelys
fr: E14XX, Amidons modifiés, amidon modifié, amidons transformés, amidon transformé, catégorie d'additifs de 1401 à 1452
hr: E14XX, modificirani škrob
hu: E14XX, Módosított keményítő
it: E14XX, Amido modificato
ja: E14XX, 加工デンプン
lt: E14XX, Modifikuotas krakmolas
lv: E14XX, Modificēta ciete
mt: E14XX, Lamtu mmodifikat
nl: E14XX, Gemodificeerde zetmelen, gemodificeerd zetmeel
pl: E14XX, Skrobia modyfikowana
pt: E14XX, Amido modificado
ro: E14XX, Amidon modificat
sk: E14XX, Modifikované škroby
sl: E14XX, Modificiran skrob
sv: E14XX, Modifierad stärkelse
zh: 化製澱粉

en: E1503, Castor oil
xx: E1503
af: E1503, Kasterolie
ar: E1503, زيت الخروع
az: E1503, Kastor yağı
bg: E1503, Рициново масло
bs: E1503, Ricinusovo ulje
ca: E1503, Oli de ricí
cs: E1503, Ricinový olej
da: E1503, Ricinusolie, Amerikansk olie
de: E1503, Rizinusöl, Castoröl, Ricinusöl, Ricinenöl, Castor Oil, Kastoröl
el: E1503, Καστορέλαιο, Ρετσινόλαδο, Ρητινέλαιο, Κικινέλαιο
eo: E1503, Ricinoleo
es: E1503, Aceite de ricino, Aceite de castor
et: E1503, Kastoorõli
eu: E1503, Errizinu olio
fa: E1503, روغن کرچک
fi: E1503, Risiiniöljy, Risiiniöljyä
fr: E1503, Huile de ricin, 8001-79-4
ga: E1503, Ola castor
gl: E1503, Aceite de ricino
he: E1503, שמן קיק
hi: E1503, अरंडी का तेल
hr: E1503, Ricinusovo ulje
hu: E1503, Ricinusolaj
hy: E1503, Կասկածելի յուղ
id: E1503, Minyak jarak
is: E1503, Hægindisolía
it: E1503, Olio di ricino
ja: E1503, ヒマシ油
ka: E1503, აბუსალათინის ზეთი
ko: E1503, 피마자 기름
lt: E1503, Ricinų aliejus
lv: E1503, Rīcineļļa
mk: E1503, Рицинусово масло
ms: E1503, Minyak kastor
mt: E1503, Żejt ir-riġnu
nl: E1503, Wonderolie, Castorolie, Ricinusolie
no: E1503, Ricinusolje
pl: E1503, Olej rycynowy
pt: E1503, Óleo de rícino, Óleo de mamona
ro: E1503, Ulei de ricin
ru: E1503, Касторовое масло, Касторка, Е1503
sk: E1503, Ricínový olej
sl: E1503, Ricinusovo olje
sq: E1503, Vaj ricini
sr: E1503, Рицинусово уље
sv: E1503, Ricinolja
th: E1503, น้ำมันละหุ่ง
tr: E1503, Hint yağı
uk: E1503, Рицинова олія
vi: E1503, Dầu thầu dầu
zh: E1503, 蓖麻油

en: E1504, ethyl acetate, ethyl ethanoate
xx: E1504
cs: E1504, Ethylacetát, Octan etylnatý, Ethyl-acetát, Ethylester kyseliny octové, Etyl-acetát
de: E1504, Essigsäureethylester, Ethansäureethylester, Äthylacetat, Essigäther, Essigether, Essigester, Ethylethanoat, Ethylacetat
el: E1504, Αιθανικός αιθυλεστέρας, Αιθανικό αιθύλιο, Οξικός αιθυλεστέρας, Οξικό αιθύλιο
es: E1504, Etanoato de etilo, Acetato de etilo, Acetidina
et: E1504, Etüülatsetaat
fi: E1504, Etyyliasetaatti, Etikkaeetteri, Etikkahappoetyyliesteri, Etyyliasetaattia, Etikkaeetteriä, Etikkahappoetyyliesteriä
fr: E1504, Acétate d'éthyle, Éthanoate d'éthyle, 141-78-6
hu: E1504, Etil-acetát
it: E1504, Acetato di etile, CH3COOC2H5, Etilacetato, Etil acetato, Acetil etere, Acetiletere
lt: E1504, Etilacetatas
lv: E1504, Etilacetāts
nl: E1504, Ethylacetaat, Ethylethanoaat, Azijnether, 141-78-6
pl: E1504, Octan etylu, Etanian etylu, Eter octowy
pt: E1504, Acetato de etila, Acetato de etilo, Etanoato de etila
ro: E1504, Acetat de etil
sk: E1504, Etylacetát
sl: E1504, Etilacetat, Etil acetat
sv: E1504, Etylacetat, Ättiketer, Etyletanoat, T-Röd

en: E1505, Triethyl citrate, triethyl 2-hydroxypropane-1\,2\,3-tricarboxylate
xx: E1505
bg: E1505, Триетил цитрат
ca: E1505, Citrat de trietil
cs: E1505, Triethyl-citrát
da: E1505, Triethylcitrat
de: E1505, Triethylcitrat, Citronensäuretriethylester, Zitronensäuretriethylester, Triethylzitrat
el: E1505, Κιτρικος τριαιθυλεστερας
es: E1505, Citrato de trietilo
et: E1505, Triethyl citrate
fa: E1505, تری‌اتیل سیترات
fi: E1505, Trietyylisitraatti, Trietyylisitraattia
fr: E1505, Citrate de triéthyle
hu: E1505, Trietil-citrát
it: E1505, Citrato di trietile
lt: E1505, Trietilcitratas
lv: E1505, Trietilcitrāts
mt: E1505, Ċitrat trietiliku
nl: E1505, Triëthylcitraat
nn: E1505, trietylsitrat
pl: E1505, Cytrynian trietylowy
pt: E1505, Citrato trietílico
ro: E1505, Trietilcitrat
ru: E1505, Триэтилцитрат
sh: E1505, Trietil citrat
sk: E1505, Trietylcitrát
sl: E1505, Trietilcitrat
sr: E1505, Trietil citrat
sv: E1505, Trietylcitrat
zh: E1505, 檸檬酸三乙酯

en: E1510, Ethanol, ethyl alcohol, Methylcarbinol, Ethyl hydroxide, Ethyl hydrate
xx: E1510
bg: E1510, Етанол
cs: E1510, ethanol, Etanol, Ethylalkohol, Etylalkohol, C2H5OH
da: E1510, Ethanol, ethylalkohol
de: E1510, Ethanol, Äthanol, Ethylalkohol
el: E1510, Αιθανόλη
es: E1510, etanol, alcohol etílico, EtOH
et: E1510, Etanool
fi: E1510, etanoli, etyylialkoholi, etanolia, etyylialkoholia
fr: E1510, Éthanol, alcool éthylique, 64-17-5, E 1510, Flegmasse, EtOH
hr: E1510, etanol, etilni alkohol
hu: E1510, etanol, etil-alkohol, borszesz
it: E1510, etanolo, alcol etilico, Alcool etilico, Alcol denaturato, C2H5OH
lt: E1510, Etanolis
lv: E1510, etanols
nl: E1510, ethanol
pl: E1510, etanol, alkohol etylowy
pt: E1510, etanol, Álcool etílico, C2H6O
ro: E1510, etanol
sk: E1510, Etanol, Ethanol
sl: E1510, Etanol
sv: E1510, Etanol

en: E1517, Glyceryl diacetate
xx: E1517
bg: E1517, Глицерил диацетат
ca: E1517, Diacetat de gliceril, diacetina
cs: E1517, Glyceryl-diacetát
da: E1517, Glyceryldiacetat
de: E1517, Glycerindiacetat, Diacetin, E 1517
el: E1517, Διακετινη (διγλυκεριδιο του οξικου οξεος)
es: E1517, Diacetato de glicerilo
et: E1517, Glütserüüldiatsetaat
fi: E1517, Glyseryylidiasetaatti, Diasetiini, Glyseryylidiasetaattia, Diasetiinia
fr: E1517, Diacétine, Diacétate de glycéryle, Glyceroldiacétate
hu: E1517, Gliceril-diacetát
it: E1517, Diacetato di glicerile
lt: E1517, Glicerildiacetatas
lv: E1517, Glicerildiacetāts
mt: E1517, Diaċetat tal-gliċeril
nl: E1517, Glyceryldiacetaat
pl: E1517, Dioctan glicerolu
pt: E1517, Diacetato de glicerilo
ro: E1517, Diacetat de gliceril
sk: E1517, Glyceryl diacetát
sl: E1517, Glicerildiacetat
sv: E1517, Glyceryldiacetat, Diacetin

en: E1518, Glyceryl triacetate, Triacetin, glycerin triacetate, 1\,2\,3-triacetoxypropane
xx: E1518
bg: E1518, Глицерил триацетат
ca: E1518, Triacetat de gliceril, triacetina
cs: E1518, Glyceryl-triacetát, Glycerolester kyseliny octové
da: E1518, Glyceryltriacetat
de: E1518, Glycerintriacetat, Triacetin, E 1518, 1\,2\,3-Propantriol-triacetat, Triessigsäureglycerinester, Triacetylglycerin, 1\,2\,3-Triacetoxypropan
el: E1518, Τριακετινη (τριγλυκεριδιο του οξικου οξεος)
es: E1518, Triacetato de glicerilo, Triacetín
et: E1518, Glütserüültriatsetaat
fi: E1518, Glyserolitriasetaatti, Glyserolitriasetaattia
fr: E1518, Triacétine, Triacétate de glycéryle, E 1518, 102-76-1, 1\,2\,3-Triacétoxypropane, C9H14O6, Triacétate de glycérine
hr: E1518, gliceril triacetat
hu: E1518, Gliceril-triacetát
it: E1518, Triacetato di glicerile, C9H14O6, Triacetina
lt: E1518, Gliceriltriacetatas
lv: E1518, Glicerīna triacetāts
mt: E1518, Triaċetat tal-gliċeril
nl: E1518, Glyceryltriacetaat, Glyceroltriacetaat, Triacetine
pl: E1518, Trioctan glicerolu
pt: E1518, Triacetato de glicerilo, Triacetina
ro: E1518, Triacetat de gliceril
sk: E1518, Glyceryltriacetát
sl: E1518, Gliceriltriacetat
sv: E1518, Glyceryltriacetat

en: E1519, Benzyl alcohol, Phenylcarbinol, Phenylmethyl alcohol, Benzenemethanol
xx: E1519
bg: E1519, Бензил алкохол, Фенилкарбинол, фенилметил алкохол, бензенметанол
ca: E1519, Alcohol benzílic, alcohol benzilic
cs: E1519, Benzylalkohol, Fenylmethanol, fenylmethylalkohol, benzenmethanol
da: E1519, Benzylalkohol, Phenylcarbinol, phenylmethylalkohol, benzenmethanol
de: E1519, Benzylalkohol, Phenylcarbinol, Phenylmethanol
el: E1519, Βενζυλικη αλκοολη, Φαινυλοκαρβινόλη, φαινυλομεθυλική αλκοόλη, βενζολομεθανόλη
es: E1519, Alcohol bencílico, Fenilcarbinol, alcohol de fenilmetilo, bencenometanol
et: E1519, Bensüülalkohol, Fenüülkarbinool, fenüülmetüülalkohol, benseenmetanool
fi: E1519, Bentsyylialkoholi, Fenyylikarbinoli, fenyylimetyylialkoholi, bentseenimetanoli, Bentsyylialkoholia, Fenyylikarbinolia, fenyylimetyylialkoholia, bentseenimetanolia
fr: E1519, Alcool benzylique, Phénylcarbinol, alcool phénylméthylique, benzèneméthanol
hu: E1519, Benzil-alkohol, Fenil-karbinol, Fenil-metil-alkohol, Benzol-metanol
it: E1519, Alcol benzilico, Fenilcarbinolo, alcol fenilmetilico, benzene-metanolo, Alcool benzilico
lt: E1519, Benzilo alkoholis, Fenilkarbinolis, fenilmetilo alkoholis, benzenmetanolis
lv: E1519, Benzilspirts, Fenilkarbinols, Fenilmetilspirts, benzolmetanols
mt: E1519, Alkoħol benżiliku, Fenilkarbinol, Alkoħol fenilmetiliku, Benżenmetanol
nl: E1519, Benzylalcohol, Fenylcarbinol, fenylmethylalcohol, benzeenmethanol
pl: E1519, Alkohol benzylowy, Fenylokarbinol, alkohol fenylometylowy, benzenometanol
pt: E1519, Álcool benzílico, Fenilcarbinol, álcool fenilmetílico, benzenometanol
ro: E1519, Alcool benzilic, Fenilcarbinol, Alcool fenilmetilic, Benzenmetanol
sk: E1519, Benzylalkohol, Fenylkarbinol, fenylmetyl alkohol, benzénmetanol
sl: E1519, Benzil alkohol, fenilkarbinol, fenilmetil alkohol
sv: E1519, Bensylalkohol, Fenylkarbinol, fenylmetylalkohol, bensenmetanol
tr: E1519, Benzil alkol

en: E1520, Propylene Glycol, Propane-1\,2-diol, Propan-1\,2-diol
xx: E1520
bg: E1520, Пропан-1\,2-диол
ca: E1520, propilenglicol, 1\,2-propà-diol
cs: E1520, Propan-1\,2-diol
da: E1520, Propan-1\,2-diol
de: E1520, Propan-1\,2-diol
el: E1520, Προπανοδιολη-1, 2 (προπυλενογλυκολη)
es: E1520, Propano-1\,2-diol
et: E1520, 1\,2-propaandiool
fi: E1520, Propyyliglykoli, Propaani-1\,2-dioli, Propyyliglykolia, Propaani-1\,2-diolia
fr: E1520, Propylène glycol, propane diol - 1\, 2-diol
hr: E1520
hu: E1520, Propán-1\,2-diol, propilénglikol
it: E1520, 1\,2-propandiolo
lt: E1520, 1\,2-propandiolis
lv: E1520, Propān-1\,2-diols
mt: E1520, Propan-1\,2-diol
nl: E1520, Propaan-1\,2-diol
pl: E1520, Propano-1\,2-diol
pt: E1520, Propano-1\,2-diol
ro: E1520, 1\,2-propandiol
ru: E1520, Пропиленгликоль
sk: E1520, Propán-1\,2-diol
sl: E1520, Propan-1\,2-diol
sv: E1520, Propan-1\,2-diol

en: E1521, Polyethylene glycol
xx: E1521
bg: E1521, Полиетиленгликол
ca: E1521, Polietilenglicol
cs: E1521, Polyethylenglykol
da: E1521, Polyethylenglycol
de: E1521, Polyethylenglycol, Polyethylenglykol, Polyethylenoxid, PEG-40, PEG-7, PEG-8, Macrogol, PEG-400
el: E1521, Πολυαιθυλενογλυκολες
es: E1521, Polietilenglicol
et: E1521, Polüetüleenglükool
fi: E1521, Polyeteeniglykolit, Polyeteeniglykoleja
fr: E1521, Polyéthylène glycol, Macrogol, poly ethane diol - 1, Polyéthylèneglycols, 25322-68-3, Polyoxyéthylène, Poly oxyde d'éthylène
hu: E1521, Polietilénglikol
it: E1521, Polietilenglicole, Glicole polietilenico, Polietileneglicole, Glicol polietilenico, C2nH4n+2On+1
lt: E1521, Polietilenglikolis
lv: E1521, Polietilēnglikols
mt: E1521, Glikol tal-polietilen
nl: E1521, Polyethyleenglycol, Macrogol, Polyethyleenoxide, Polyetheenoxide
pl: E1521, Glikol polietylenowy, Poli(tlenek etylenu), Poliglikol, Polietylenoglikol, Makrogole, Makrogol
pt: E1521, Polietilenoglicol, Polietileno glicol
ro: E1521, Polietilenglicol
sk: E1521, Polyetylénglykol, Polyoxyetylén, Polyetylénoxid
sl: E1521, Polietilenglikol
sv: E1521, Polyetylenglykol

en: isomaltose
ar: أيزومالتوز
az: İzomaltoza
bg: Изомалтоза
ca: Isomaltosa
cs: Isomaltóza
da: Isomaltose
de: Isomaltose
el: Ισομαλτόζη
es: Isomaltosa
et: Isomaltoos
fa: ایزومالتوز
fi: Isomaltoosi
fr: Isomaltose
hu: Izomaltóz
it: Isomaltosio
ja: イソマルトース
ko: 이소말토오스
lt: Izomaltozė
lv: Izomaltoze
nl: Isomaltose
pl: Izomaltoza
pt: Isomaltose
ro: Izomaltoză
ru: Изомальтоза
sk: Izomaltóza
sl: Izomaltoza
sv: Isomaltos
tr: İzomaltoz
uk: Ізомальтоза
zh: 异麦芽糖

en: potassium iodide
ar: يوديد البوتاسيوم
az: Kalium yodid
bg: Калиев йодид
ca: Iodur de potassi
cs: Jodid draselný
da: Kaliumiodid
de: Kaliumiodid
el: Ιωδιούχο κάλιο
es: yoduro potásico
et: Kaaliumjodiid
fi: Kaliumjodidi
fr: Iodure de potassium
hr: kalijev jodid
hu: kálium-jodid
it: ioduro di potassio
ja: ヨウ化カリウム
ko: 요오드화 칼륨
lt: Kalio jodidas
lv: Kālija jodīds
mk: Калиум јодид
nl: Kaliumjodide
pl: Jodek potasu
pt: Iodeto de potássio
ro: Iodură de potasiu
ru: Йодид калия
sk: Jodid draselný
sl: Kalijev jodid
sq: Jodur kaliumi
sr: Калијум јодид
sv: Kaliumjodid
tr: Potasyum iyodür
uk: Йодид калію
zh: 碘化钾

en: methylsulfonylmethane, dimethyl sulfone, methyl sulfone
xx: MSM, OptiMSM
sv: metylsulfonylmetan

en: hydroxymethylbutyrate, HMB
xx: hydroxymethylbutyrate, HMB

en: Amino acids
ar: أحماض أمينية
az: Amin turşuları
bg: Аминокиселини
ca: Aminoàcids
cs: Aminokyseliny
da: Aminosyrer
de: Aminosäuren
el: Αμινοξέα, Αμινοξέα κ.λπ
es: Aminoácidos
et: Aminohapped
fa: آمینو اسیدها
fi: Aminohapot
fr: Acides aminés
hr: Aminokiseline
hu: Aminosavak
it: Amminoacidi
ja: アミノ酸, アミノ酸等
ko: 아미노산
lt: Amino rūgštys
lv: Aminoskābes
mk: Амино киселини
nl: Aminozuren
pl: Aminokwasy
pt: Aminoácidos
ro: Aminoacizi
ru: Аминокислоты
sk: Aminokyseliny
sl: Aminokisline
sq: Acide amine
sr: Аминокиселине
sv: Aminosyror
tr: Amino asitler
uk: Амінокислоти
zh: 氨基酸

en: Nucleic acids
it: Acidi nucleici
ja: 核酸

en: Organic acids
it: Acidi organici
ja: 有機酸